Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB624.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "law enforcement officer" means a member of a lawfully
organized police unit or police force of city, county, urban-county government,
consolidated local government, or charter county government who is responsible
for the detection of crime and the enforcement of the general criminal laws of the
Commonwealth, as well as a sheriff and a sworn deputy sheriff.
(2) A law enforcement officer may, without delay or advance notice, enter in or upon
vacant and abandoned property to secure the property and arrest or remove any
person unlawfully occupying the property.
(3) Real property shall be presumed vacant and abandoned under this section if a
legal resident or other person legally entitled to occupy the property has not
resided at the property for a period of forty-five (45) or more consecutive days and
two (2) or more of the following or similar circumstances which would lead a
reasonable person to believe that the property is vacant exist:
(a) Overgrown or dead vegetation;
(b) Accumulation of flyers, mail, or trash;
(c) Disconnected utilities;
(d) The absence of window coverings or furniture;
(e) Uncorrected hazardous conditions or vandalism; or
(f) Statements of neighbors, delivery persons, or government employees that
the property is vacant.
(4) A law enforcement officer acting in good faith under this section shall be
immune from criminal and civil liability.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 11/20/2025 9:59 AM Jacketed